Utah statutes.
17-18a-301.   County officers.

(1)  The county attorney is an elected officer as described in Section 17-53-101.

(2) (a)  If the boundaries of a prosecution district are located entirely within one county, the district attorney of the prosecution district is an elected officer of that county.

(b)  If the boundaries of a prosecution district include more than one county, the interlocal agreement that creates that prosecution district in accordance with Section 17-18a-602 may designate the district attorney as an elected officer in one or more of the counties in which the prosecution district is located.

(3)  The district attorney:

(a)  is a full-time employee of the prosecution district; and

(b)  may not engage in the private practice of law.

(4)  A county attorney may:

(a)  serve as a part-time employee; and

(b)  engage in the private practice of law, subject to Section 17-18a-605 and the Rules of Professional Conduct.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

